Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
SECRETARY OF STATE

7-121-301. Powers - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 652, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

(1) This article was added in 1997. This part 3 was subsequently repealed in 2003, effective July 1, 2004, and was not amended prior to its repeal. For the text of this part 3 prior to 2004, consult the 2003 Colorado Revised Statutes.

(2) Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)